Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB298.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Waivers to be Requested for Medical Assistance.--(a) The department shall request Federal approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Depart ment of Health and Human Services for a demonstration waiver under 42 U.S.C. § 1315 (relating to demonstration projects) to enable the department to: (1) Prohibit re-enrollment and deny eligibility for up to six months for nondisabled, nonpregnant adults between nineteen and sixty-four years of age who fail to report changes in circumstances that affect their eligibility for medical 12345678910111213141516171819 assistance.(2) Redetermine the medical assistance eligibility of an individual covered under this waiver once every six months instead of once every twelve months.(3) Suspend the medical assistance requirement to renew eligibility automatically based on available information and suspend the medical assistance requirement to use a prepopulated renewal form.(b) The following shall apply to approval:(1) The department shall report receipt of approval of any waiver submitted under subsection (a) to:(i) The Attorney General.(ii) The Auditor General.(iii) The Office of Inspector General.(iv) The members of the General Assembly.(v) The Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the notice of approval of the waiver.(2) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this section.(c) If Federal approval for any waiver under subsection (a) is denied, the department shall resubmit a request for approval of the waiver within twenty-four months of the original denial and each subsequent denial thereafter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0298PN0242 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425